Vermont, session 2025-2026, H776.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9423 is added to read:
§ 9423. USE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN COVERAGE
DECISIONS
(a) A health plan, as defined in section 9418 of this title, that uses an
artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for the purpose of
utilization review, or that contracts with or otherwise works through an entity
that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for the
purpose of utilization review, shall ensure all of the following:
(1) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool bases its
determination on the following information, as applicable:
(A) an insured’s medical or other clinical history;
(B) the specific clinical circumstances as presented by the requesting
health care provider; and
(C) other relevant clinical information contained in the insured’s
medical or other clinical record.
(2) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
base its determination solely on a group dataset.
(3) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is fairly
applied, including in accordance with any applicable regulations and guidance
issued by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.
VT LEG #385694 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.776
2026 Page 3 of 4
(4) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is
configured and applied in a standard, consistent manner for all health plans and
insureds so that the resulting decisions are the same for all patients with similar
clinical presentation and considerations.
(5) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is open
to inspection for audit or compliance reviews by the Department of Financial
Regulation and by other State agencies and departments pursuant to applicable
State and federal law.
(6) Disclosures pertaining to the use of the artificial intelligence,
algorithm, or other software tool in the utilization review process and the
nature and degree of human review and oversight are contained in the health
plan’s written policies and procedures to the extent required by the Department
of Financial Regulation.
(7) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool’s
performance, use, and outcomes are reviewed and revised at least quarterly to
maximize accuracy and reliability.
(8) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
directly or indirectly cause harm to the insured.
(b) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool utilized by a
health plan shall not deny, delay, or modify a determination of whether to
authorize the coverage of health care services. An adverse coverage
VT LEG #385694 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.776
2026 Page 4 of 4
determination shall be made only by a licensed human health care provider
who is competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the health
care services requested by a treating health care provider by reviewing and
considering the requesting provider’s recommendation; the insured’s medical
or other clinical history, as appropriate; and the specific clinical circumstances.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385694 v.1